California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
The board of supervisors in any county may contract with any other county or counties or with the department for the operation and maintenance of such public social services as are provided in one or more of the contracting counties, or for the establishment and maintenance of such public social services as the board of supervisors shall deem to be desirable to discharge the duties of the county to provide for public social services for those eligible therefor or the health and care of the sick. Except as provided in Section 11050, the cost of contracted services shall be borne by the contracting county or counties and shall, insofar as state or federal funds are involved, conform to department standards and regulations generally applicable to such services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 578.)
-------------------------------------------

10804.1.

The board of supervisors in any county may contract with any other county or counties or with the State Department of Health Services for the operation and maintenance of such services as are provided in one or more of the contracting counties, or for the establishment and maintenance of such services as the board of supervisors shall deem to be desirable to discharge the duties of the county to provide for services for those eligible therefor or the health and care of the sick. The cost of contracted services shall be borne by the contracting county or counties and shall, insofar as state or federal funds are involved, conform to department standards and regulations generally applicable to such services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

10805.

Each worker employed by the department or the State Department of Health Services whose responsibilities require making home visits shall be provided with an identification card, showing the name and position of the worker, and containing a recent picture. Upon calling at the home of any applicant for or recipient of public social services, the worker shall display the identification card to the applicant or recipient.

Should a worker terminate his employment with the agency, he shall return his identification card to the agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 432.)
-------------------------------------------

10806.

If a dispute occurs between counties as to the responsibility for public social services for an applicant or recipient, either county may submit the dispute to the department or the State Department of Health Services, whichever department has jurisdiction. The decision of the appropriate department shall be final.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

10808.

Any report published by the county in written or graphic form of expenditures for public social services shall show clearly the amount and proportion of costs borne by local taxes and the amount and proportion of costs borne by the state and federal governments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

10809.

The county department shall administer the public social services authorized or permitted under the applicable portions of this code in accordance with the regulations of the department and the State Department of Health Services.

The county department shall make such reports to the appropriate department as may be required.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

10810.

Subject to the approval of the department each county department is authorized to sponsor and conduct programs for the recruitment, training, and utilization of volunteers to assist county department employees in the performance of office duties and to aid in performing services in the counties including but not limited to the following:

(a) Friendly visiting of the indigent aged;

(b) Finding homes for foster children;

(c) Escorting and transporting recipients to clinics and other destinations; 

(d) Aiding in location of improved housing;

(e) Teaching homemaking skills and aiding in budgeting and care of the household;

(f) Providing tutoring and other educational aid.

Volunteers shall not duplicate services performed by county department employees.

The county department shall maintain the confidentiality of records of recipients.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

10812.

In addition to services, as defined in Section 10053, that may be required under this division a county may provide any service permitted by federal law and for which federal participation is available.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 578.)
-------------------------------------------

10813.1.

Each county shall submit to the department by December 31 of each year a comprehensive plan for the financing and delivery of social services for the next fiscal year to meet the purposes of Section 10053. Such plan shall specify a priority of services for adults and for families and children.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 432.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4.1. Statewide Automated Welfare System [10816. - 10824.5.]

10816.

The system shall have the following goals:

(a) Prompt and accurate verification of eligibility.

(b) Accurate computation and timely disbursal of benefits for such public assistance programs.

(c) Equitable, timely, and consistent treatment of recipients within each program.

(d) Reduction of administrative complexity.

(e) Strict enforcement of management and fiscal controls.

(f) Collection of management information.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 282.)
-------------------------------------------

10817.

The department shall seek advice and assistance from the State Department of Health Services and counties in the planning and implementation of the system so that efficient, effective, and equitable administration of public assistance programs can be maintained.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1133.)
-------------------------------------------

10818.

The department shall submit to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee by August 1, 1984, a detailed work plan for the implementation of the statewide automated welfare system. The work plan shall include at least the following:

(a) A detailed description of the functions to be performed by the system.

(b) The sequence of the functions to be assumed by the system, and the dates on which the functions would be assumed.

(c) The long-range design goals for California’s welfare computer systems.

(d) The cost of the equipment and the administrative costs of implementing the system.

(e) The impact of such a system on the administration of such public assistance programs.

(f) Mechanisms by which the savings resulting from computer systems development can be recouped through reduced welfare administrative costs.

(g) A detailed description of how the data will be collected, stored, and disseminated to protect the privacy of individuals to ensure the confidentiality of such data.

(h) Recommendations for necessary legislative changes to implement the system. 

The department shall provide to the counties no later than July 15, 1984, copies of the draft of the detailed work plan. The counties may submit no later than August 15, 1984, to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee their comments and recommendations on the detailed work plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 268, Sec. 40.7.   Effective June 30, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

10819.

The department may test the system in several counties prior to actual statewide implementation. Criteria in selecting county test sites may include high dollar error rates for overpayments and payments to ineligibles, high administrative unit costs, size of county, and scope of data-processing activities.

The department may delay implementation of the system in counties where not cost effective. If the implementation is delayed in such counties, the counties shall make available their data on a timely basis so that a statewide file on public assistance recipients can be maintained.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 268, Sec. 40.9.   Effective June 30, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

10820.

To ensure statewide uniformity in program administration, the department shall do the following:

(a) Develop and publish an exclusive manual of standards procedures for use by county welfare departments in their daily administration of public assistance programs.

(b) Provide a comprehensive training package for the use of the uniform standards manual.

(c) Develop standard forms to use with the statewide automated welfare system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 268, Sec. 41.2.   Effective June 30, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

10823.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to reduce or otherwise impair the authority of the State Department of Health Services under Sections 10740 and 14100.1 as the single state agency responsible for administration of the medical assistance program. However, the State Department of Social Services shall develop and implement a statewide automated welfare system for the public assistance programs as provided in Section 10815. The department, in developing this system, shall recognize and utilize to the extent feasible, the centralized Medi-Cal eligibility system now maintained by the State Department of Health Services, and shall ensure that the fully implemented system shall meet those Medi-Cal program requirements deemed necessary by the State Department of Health Services. Both departments shall coordinate their efforts to ensure the mutual benefits of the statewide automated welfare system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 268, Sec. 41.7.   Effective June 30, 1984.   See same-numbered section, as amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 43.)
-------------------------------------------

10823.

(a) (1) The Office of Technology and Solutions Integration shall implement a statewide automated welfare system for the following public assistance programs:

(A) The CalWORKs program.

(B) CalFresh.

(C) The Medi-Cal program.

(D) The foster care program.

(E) The refugee program.

(F) County medical services programs.

(2) Statewide implementation of the statewide automated welfare system for the programs listed in
 paragraph (1) shall be achieved through no more than four county consortia, including the Interim Statewide Automated Welfare System Consortium, and the Los Angeles Eligibility, Automated Determination, Evaluation, and Reporting System.

(3) Notwithstanding paragraph (2), the Office of Technology and Solutions Integration shall migrate the 35 counties that currently use the Interim Statewide Automated Welfare System (SAWS) into the C-IV system within the following timeline:

(A) Complete Migration System Test and begin User Acceptance Testing on or before June 30, 2009.

(B) Complete implementation in at least five counties by February 28, 2010.

(C) Complete implementation in at least 14 additional counties on or before May 31, 2010.

(D) Complete implementation in all 35 counties on or before August 31, 2010.

(E) Decommission the Interim Statewide Automated Welfare System on or before January 31, 2011.

(4) Notwithstanding paragraph (2), the Office of Technology and Solutions Integration shall oversee the migration of the 39 counties composing the C-IV Consortium into a system jointly designed by the 39 counties plus Los Angeles County under the LEADER Replacement System contract. This migration shall result in a new consortium to replace the LEADER and C-IV Consortia.

(5) The consortia and the state shall take any action necessary to ensure that the current SAWS maintenance and operations agreements are extended for the LEADER and C-IV Consortia, pending the completion of the LEADER Replacement System and migration of the C-IV Consortium as set forth in paragraph (4), and for the continuation of the Welfare Client Data System Consortium.

(6) Each SAWS
 consortium shall provide a seat on its governing body for a representative of the state and shall allow for the stationing of state staff at the project site.

(b) Nothing in subdivision (a) transfers program policy responsibilities related to the public assistance programs specified in subdivision (a) from the State Department of Social Services or the State Department of Health Care Services to the Office of Technology and Solutions Integration.

(c) (1) On February 1 of each year, the Office of Technology and Solutions Integration shall provide an annual report to the appropriate committees of the Legislature on the statewide automated welfare system implemented under this section. The report shall address the progress of state and consortia activities and any significant schedule, budget, or functionality changes in the project.

(2) The report provided pursuant to this subdivision in 2012 shall also include the projected timeline and key milestones for the development of the LEADER Replacement System and of the new consortium described in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a).

(d) Notwithstanding any other law, the Statewide Automated Welfare System consortia shall have the authority to expend within
 approved annual state budgets for each system as follows:

(1) Make changes within any line item, provided that the change does not create additional project costs in the current or in a future budget year.

(2) Make a change of up to one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) or 10 percent of the total for the line item from which the funds are derived, whichever is greater, between line items with notice to the Office of Technology and Solutions Integration, provided that the change does not create additional project costs in the current or in a future budget year.

(3) Make requests to the Office of Technology and Solutions Integration for changes between line items of greater than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) or 10 percent of the total for the line item from which the funds are derived, which do not increase the total cost in the current or a future budget year. The Office of Technology and Solutions Integration shall take action to approve or deny the request within 10 days.

(e) (1) The Statewide Automated Welfare System shall be the system of record for Medi-Cal and shall contain all Medi-Cal eligibility rules and case management functionality.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), the business rules necessary for an eligibility determination to be made under the Modified Adjusted Gross Income (MAGI) rules pursuant to the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (Public Law 111-148) may be housed in the California Healthcare Eligibility, Enrollment, and Retention System developed pursuant to Section 15926, hereafter referred to as CalHEERS. If that
 authority is exercised, the business rules contained in CalHEERS shall be made available to the Statewide Automated Welfare System consortia, through an automated interface, in order for the consortia to determine eligibility for Medi-Cal under the MAGI rules.

(3) Effective January 1, 2016, the functionality to create and send notices of action for Medi-Cal and premium tax credit programs, as described in Section 36B of Title 26 of the United States Code, shall be implemented consistent with the following:

(A) Except as specified in subparagraphs (B) and (C), the Statewide Automated Welfare System shall be used to generate noticing language and notice of action documents and to send notice of action documents for all Medi-Cal programs, including, but not limited to, MAGI and non-MAGI based programs.

(B) If authority
 is exercised pursuant to paragraph (2), CalHEERS shall be used to generate noticing language for the premium tax credit program, including, but not limited to, Medi-Cal denial noticing language related to tax subsidy approvals, and shall be used to generate and send notice of action documents for the premium tax credit only program.

(C) If authority is exercised pursuant to paragraph (2), in any mixed eligibility cases that include an approval or approvals for MAGI Medi-Cal eligibility determinations, non-MAGI Medi-Cal eligibility determinations, or both, and premium tax credit approvals, the Statewide Automated Welfare System shall be used to combine the noticing language for Medi-Cal programs generated by the Statewide Automated Welfare System and the noticing language for the premium tax credit program generated by CalHEERS into one notice, and the Statewide Automated Welfare System shall be used to send the document, as one combined notice,
 for all programs.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 846, Sec. 1) by Stats. 2023, Ch. 43, Sec. 38.   (AB 120)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

10823.1.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that representatives from the State Department of Social Services, the State Department of Health Care Services, the Office of Technology and Solutions Integration, the SAWS consortia, and the counties meet with advocates, clients, and other stakeholders no less than quarterly to review the development status of the California Automated Consortium Eligibility System (CalACES) and the California Statewide Automated Welfare System (CalSAWS) projects.

(b) Meeting agendas shall be established based on input from all parties, who may indicate their priorities for discussion.

(c) The State Department of Social Services, the State Department of Health Care Services, the Office of Technology and Solutions Integration, and the SAWS consortia shall engage with stakeholders to discuss current and planned functionality changes, system demonstrations of public portals and mobile applications, and advocates’ identification of areas of concern, especially with the design of public-facing elements and other areas that directly impact clients.

(d) These meetings shall commence in the summer of 2018 and shall continue at least quarterly through development, implementation, and maintenance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 43, Sec. 39.   (AB 120)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

10823.2.

(a) The State Department of Social Services, the State Department of Health Care Services, and the Office of Technology and Solutions Integration shall develop, in consultation with the County Welfare Directors Association of California, the SAWS consortia, and stakeholders, a formal process for health and human services advocates and clients to provide input into new or changing public-facing elements of CalACES and CalSAWS.

(b) The process described in subdivision (a) shall include public portals, mobile applications, notices, certain ancillary services, and intercounty transfers.

(c) The process described in subdivision (a) may include focus groups, user-centered design sessions, and user acceptance testing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 43, Sec. 40.   (AB 120)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

10823.3.

(a) The development of the SAWS enrollment and eligibility functionality, case management systems, ancillary services, public portals, and mobile applications shall, to the extent possible within the technology, have the goals of:

(1) Minimizing the burden of the overall eligibility process for enrollment and retention of benefits for low-income Californians and streamlining interactions for both clients and eligibility workers.

(2) Facilitating applicant and client submission of feedback.

(b) The parties listed in subdivision (a) of Section 10823.1 shall jointly update the Legislature at least twice per year through
 existing processes as to how the SAWS development, implementation, and maintenance minimizes client burden in order to improve access to safety net programs and incorporates ongoing applicant and client feedback towards continuous improvement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 27, Sec. 28.   (SB 80)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10823.5.

The State Department of Social Services shall pay the county share of Merced County’s Merced Automated Global Information Control (MAGIC) application maintenance costs until September 30, 1998, or until Merced County has converted its caseload to one of the Statewide Automated Welfare System (SAWS) consortia systems, whichever occurs first. Merced County shall be the first county implemented under the SAWS consortium system approved for Merced County. Beginning October 1, 1998, Merced County shall pay the county share of MAGIC application maintenance costs based on its percentage share of the total caseload for the consortium approved for Merced County on October 1, 1998. The caseload percentage share shall be adjusted each fiscal year to reflect changes in caseload throughout the consortium. Caseload for the purposes of this section shall be defined as actual average annual duplicated case counts for the most current full fiscal year for the programs included in the consortia system. Beginning October 1, 1998, and until Merced County has converted its caseload to the SAWS consortium approved for Merced County, the department shall pay the difference between the total county share of MAGIC application maintenance costs and the Merced County caseload percentage share of MAGIC application costs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 606, Sec. 21.   Effective October 3, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

10823.6.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that health and human services programs shall leverage telephonic signature technology to enhance the ability for county human services customers and staff to complete transactions by telephone through the creation of a global telephonic signature solution for use by county human services departments, to the extent permitted by program policy.

(b) The California Statewide Automated Welfare System (CalSAWS) consortium shall be authorized to develop, deploy, and maintain a simple, standalone telephonic signature solution according to the following requirements:

(1) The telephonic signature solution shall allow for storage and retrieval of
 recorded telephonic signatures in compliance with program policy.

(2) This telephonic signature solution shall be available until equivalent functionality has been integrated into the following case management systems:

(A) CalSAWS.

(B) Case Management Information and Payroll System (CMIPS).

(C) California Automated Response and Engagement System (CWS-CARES).

(c) This section shall only be implemented to the extent funding is appropriated for these purposes.

(d) This section shall be rendered inoperative upon integration of the telephonic signature solution into all statewide systems included in paragraph (2) of subdivision
 (b), and is repealed as of January 1 of the calendar year following the date of the inoperability.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 85, Sec. 23.   (AB 135)   Effective July 16, 2021.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed by its own provisions.   Repealed on January 1 after inoperative date.)
-------------------------------------------

10824.

(a) The counties not participating in the Interim Statewide Automated Welfare System Consortium or the Los Angeles Eligibility, Automated Determination, Evaluation, and Reporting Consortium shall collectively pay 5 percent of the total application development costs of the Statewide Automated Welfare System consortium to which they belong. The proportion of the 5 percent of total application development costs paid by a participating county shall be the same proportion that the county’s caseload bears to the total consortium caseload for the fiscal year in which the contract for application development is executed. “Caseload” for purposes of this section, means the actual average annual duplicated case counts for the programs included in each
 consortia’s application. A county subject to this section may pay its proportion of application development costs during development of its consortium’s system, or, by agreement with the department, may pay its proportion after its consortium’s system in production, but within four years after the start of production in a county.

(b) The department shall pay the county share of all other Statewide Automated Welfare System development and implementation costs approved by the Department of Finance and the federal funding agencies for the counties participating in each consortium, except the Los Angeles Eligibility, Automated Determination, Evaluation, and Reporting Consortium.

(c) The department shall pay the county share of maintenance and operations costs for the first 12 months of production of the Statewide Automated Welfare System for the counties participating in each
 consortium, except the Los Angeles Eligibility, Automated Determination, Evaluation, and Reporting Consortium.

(d) For purposes of this section, “production” means the first conversion of a county case to the Statewide Automated Welfare System application used by the county’s consortium, or the first processing of an intake case using the county’s Statewide Automated Welfare System consortium application, whichever occurs first.

(e) The department shall pay all Statewide Automated Welfare System maintenance and operations costs for specified counties as defined in this subdivision. A county qualified for Statewide Automated Welfare System maintenance and operations funding is defined as one having an average monthly, duplicated continuing case count below 3,700 cases for the CalWORKs, nonassistance CalFresh, public assistance CalFresh, Medi-Cal, foster care, refugee, and county
 medical services programs. The department shall make its determination based on actual case counts for the most current full fiscal year. The department shall provide funding for the county share-of-costs for those counties that annually meet this definition until June 30, 2001.

(f) Beginning October 1, 1998, the original 14 Interim Statewide Automated System counties shall pay the county share of Statewide Automated Welfare System maintenance and operations costs at the county administrative cost sharing ratios otherwise provided by law. Counties described in subdivision (e) shall not be subject to this requirement.

(g) The department shall pay the county share of Napa County’s Interim Statewide Automated Welfare System’s application maintenance costs through September 30, 1998. Beginning October 1, 1998, Napa County shall pay the county share of the Interim Statewide Welfare
 System application maintenance costs at the county administrative cost sharing ratios otherwise provided by law.

(h) (1) The county shall secure the prior approval of the department for any use of Statewide Automated Welfare System equipment, software or resources for activities and program administration not eligible for federal financial participation.

(2) The county shall allocate Statewide Automated Welfare System costs to the respective programs eligible for federal financial participation in accordance with the cost allocation requirements of each program.

(3) The county shall allocate as Statewide Automated Welfare System costs only for activities and program administration eligible for federal financial participation.

(i) If a county uses Statewide Automated Welfare System equipment, software, or resources for activities and program administration not eligible for federal financial participation, and fails to comply with provisions specified in subdivision (h), the county shall be liable to the department for any disallowance due to that use by the county of Statewide Automated Welfare System equipment, software, or resources. In the event of such a loss, the department may recover the loss by reducing funds otherwise due the county as state participation in programs administered by the county under the supervision of the department.

(j) The department shall fund each county’s share of the Central Data Base for the Medi-Cal Eligibility Data System until the end of the 12th month after Statewide Automated Welfare System production begins, as defined in subdivision (d).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 227, Sec. 32.   (AB 1400)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

10824.5.

(a) Any single state automated welfare system implemented pursuant to this chapter shall include a notification to inform the caseworker of a public assistance program applicant or recipient of the following information:

(1) That the applicant or recipient has indicated the need for an accommodation due to disability consistent with Section 12132 of Title 42 of the United States Code and Section 35.130 of Title 28 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(2) That the applicant or recipient has disclosed a disability or experience of domestic violence that may affect the applicant’s or recipient’s eligibility for certain exemptions from, and exceptions to, requirements imposed by any public assistance
 program included in the single state automated welfare system pursuant to Section 10823.

(b) The State Department of Social Services shall collaborate with county welfare departments in developing the notification required by this section.

(c) The notification required by this section shall be immediately visible to the caseworker upon opening the applicant’s or recipient’s file in the system.

(d) The department shall include in any amendment of or revision to a form or report that is adopted on or after January 1, 2020, and that is to be completed by an applicant for, or a recipient of, public assistance, using the single statewide automated welfare system, questions that permit the applicant or recipient to disclose a disability, the
 need for accommodation due to disability, and any experience of domestic violence.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 155, Sec. 1.   (SB 735)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4.5. Aid Payments [10825. - 10827.]

10825.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law relating to the method of payment of aid under this part, a county may develop a payment system which, to the extent feasible, spreads the issuance of public assistance warrants evenly over the month. Such a payment system shall not be instituted until approved by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1177.)
-------------------------------------------

10826.

Upon election by a county to utilize the aid payment method provided by this chapter, the county shall submit a plan to the department for approval. The plan shall be approved by the department before it is implemented and shall include provisions for assuring that

(a) Each recipient of aid will be assigned a date or dates within the month as the date or dates on which he will be paid in subsequent months;

(b) Each warrant will be placed in the mail in order to be delivered on the assigned payment date and that in the event there is no mail delivery on the assigned payment date, the warrant will be placed in the mail in time to be delivered to the payee on the last mail delivery date prior to the payment date; and

(c) Upon changing payment dates for any recipient, the recipient will receive a pro rata payment on the old payment date in payment of the aid to which such recipient is entitled prior to the new payment date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 113.)
-------------------------------------------

10827.

To the extent permitted by federal law and notwithstanding Sections 11006.2, 11056, 11450 and 11455, a county electing to utilize the aid payment method provided by this chapter may establish new eligibility periods and payment periods which may be monthly or semimonthly and which are not limited to a calendar month to correspond with changes of payment dates under this chapter.

Changes in eligibility or payment periods under this chapter shall be approved by the department before implementation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 113.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4.6. CalWORKs Identity Verification [10831. - 10831.]

10831.

(a) The department shall implement and maintain nonbiometric identity verification methods in the CalWORKs program. The methods approved by the department as of July 1, 2018, satisfy this requirement.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), commencing July 1, 2021, for purposes of identity verification, a CalWORKs applicant or recipient may provide proof of identity via videoconferencing or any other electronic means
 that allows for a visual interaction between the applicant or recipient and county eligibility staff. Verification conducted in this manner shall satisfy any inperson identification requirement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 85, Sec. 24.   (AB 135)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4.7. Electronic Visit Verification System [10835. - 10836.]

10835.

The State Department of Social Services shall develop and implement an electronic visit verification system (EVV system) for the In-Home Supportive Services program, pursuant to this chapter. For purposes of this chapter, “electronic visit verification system” or “EVV system” means a system as described in subsection (l) of Section 1396b of Title 42 of the United States Code, as added by the federal 21st Century Cures Act (Public Law 114-255).

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 27, Sec. 31.   (SB 80)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10836.

In developing and implementing the EVV system, the department shall adhere to all of the following general principles:

(a) The EVV system shall be developed and implemented in a manner and timeframe that avoids payment of the federal financial participation penalties, as described in the federal 21st Century Cures Act.

(b) Consistent with the requirements of the federal 21st Century Cures Act, the EVV system shall be developed through a collaborative stakeholder process, and be as minimally burdensome to providers and consumers as is necessary to comply with the federal mandate to implement electronic visit verification.

(c) Consistent with the United States Supreme Court decision in Olmstead v. L.C. ex rel. Zimring (1999) 527 U.S. 581, the EVV system shall not infringe upon the rights of In-Home Supportive Services program consumers.

(d) The department shall collaborate with stakeholders to identify the least intrusive manner to record the location of in-home supportive service delivery at the time service begins and ends each day, to the extent necessary to comply with the federal 21st Century Cures Act and related federal guidance.

(e) To the maximum extent possible, the EVV system shall leverage the existing electronic and telephonic timesheet systems.

(f) The EVV system shall utilize the maximum flexibility allowed by the federal government in the definitions of the terms “personal care services,” “location of services,” and “start and stop time of each service.”

(g) The department shall not implement a violations policy or process for in-home supportive
 service providers as part of electronic visit verification. Social workers shall continue to do individual assessments, and information from electronic visit verification shall not be used to reduce a consumer’s hours.

(h) Consistent with the requirements of the federal 21st Century Cures Act, in-home supportive service providers and recipients shall be provided with training on the use of the EVV system.

(i) Consistent with the requirements of the federal 21st Century Cures Act and related federal guidance, live-in in-home supportive service providers shall not be subject to electronic visit verification requirements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 85, Sec. 25.   (AB 135)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4.8. Administrative Reform Act [10840. - 10842.]

10840.

(a) The director and the Director of Health Care Services shall implement a comprehensive program for the simplification of administration of the Aid to Families with Dependent Children, Medi-Cal, and CalFresh programs, which shall include the elements identified in Section 10841. The director shall prepare appropriate amendments in the state plan for these programs and waiver requests of federal requirements that are necessary for the implementation of this chapter.

(b) The director and the Director of Health Care Services shall, by formal order, waive the enforcement of those regulations and standards necessary to implement the project with federal approval, in order to implement
 the demonstration project.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 227, Sec. 34.   (AB 1400)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

10841.

(a) The department may establish a demonstration project that tests one or more modifications in verifications of eligibility information to reduce paperwork and achieve program savings while maintaining or improving program integrity.

(b) Aid payments may be made once monthly.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 69, Sec. 18.   Effective June 30, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

10842.

(a) The State Department of Social Services and the State Department of Health Care Services shall jointly, in consultation with the County Welfare Directors Association, establish a consolidated county administrative performance system that shall establish state subventions for county administrative costs for the Aid to Families with Dependent Children program, Medi-Cal, and CalFresh.

(b) Subventions shall be based on actual caseload for each program, including intake and continuing cases, experienced by each county. Reimbursement per case shall be uniform for similar size counties and shall be based on standards for workload performance, or cases per worker, overhead rates, and
 salary levels for welfare department personnel.

(c) Administrative standards shall be based on actual performance in the most recent fiscal year for which appropriate data is available.

(d) Allocation of costs among welfare programs shall, to the extent feasible, be based on ongoing random moment studies. Sampling rates shall be high enough to provide reasonably accurate and statistically valid updates of prior allocation ratios.

(e) This performance system shall be implemented in each county upon the establishment of a statewide automated welfare system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 227, Sec. 35.   (AB 1400)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Records [10850. - 10853.]

10850.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, all applications and records concerning any individual made or kept by a public officer or agency in connection with the administration of this code relating to any form of public social services, including protective services provided through public social services agencies, for which grants-in-aid are received by this state from the United States government shall be confidential, and shall not be open to examination for any purpose not directly connected with the administration of that program, or any investigation, prosecution, or criminal or civil proceeding conducted in connection with the administration of that program. The disclosure of information that identifies, by name or address, an applicant for, or recipient of, these grants-in-aid to any committee or legislative
 body is prohibited, except as provided in subdivision (b).
